Oklahoma, session 2025, SB114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 60 O.S. 2021, Section 122, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 122. A. For purposes of this section:


1. “Bona fide resident” shall be a lawful permanent resident of


the United States; and


2. “Lawful permanent resident” means a foreign national who has


been granted the right to reside permanently in the United States.


B. This article shall not apply to lands now owned in this


state by aliens so long as they are held by the present owners, nor


to any alien who is or shall take up bona fide residence in this


state: and any alien who is or shall become a bona fide resident of


the State of Oklahoma this state shall have the right to acquire and


hold lands in this state upon the same terms as citizens of the

Req. No. 8 Page 1


State of Oklahoma this state during the continuance of such bona


fide residence of such alien in this state: Provided, that if any


such resident alien shall cease to be a bona fide inhabitant of this


state, such alien shall have five (5) years from the time he or she


ceased to be such bona fide resident in which to alienate such


lands.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-8 TEK 12/26/2024 10:06:54 AM

























Req. No. 8 Page 2